Hawaii statutes.
§603-21.8 Appeals. The several circuit
courts shall have jurisdiction of all causes that may properly come before them
on any appeal allowed by law from any other court or agency. [L 1972, c 88,
§3(1)]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next